North Dakota, session 69, HB1097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - ACCESSIBILITY OF GOVERNMENT
SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE DEAF, HARD OF HEARING, OR HAVE HEARING
DIFFERENCES.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the accessibility of state
and local services for individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or have hearing differences.
The study must:
a. Consider the requirements under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act providing for
state and local government entities to communicate effectively with individuals who are
deaf, hard of hearing, or have hearing differences.
b. Consider challenges or barriers to effective communication for individuals who are deaf,
hard of hearing, or have hearing differences when communicating with, including
receiving information from and conveying information to, state and local government
entities, and identify strategies for improving communication.
c. Include input from the department of labor and human rights, department of health and
human services, employees of the school for the deaf, individuals who are deaf, hard of
hearing, or have hearing differences, information technology professionals, American
sign language interpreters, and family members of individuals who are deaf, hard of
hearing, or have hearing differences.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1097 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1097.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 1 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State